Illinois, session 104th, HB4636.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The New Markets Development Program Act is 5amended by changing Sections 15, 20, 25, and 50 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 663/15)7    Sec. 15. Transferability. No tax credit claimed under this 8Act shall be refundable or saleable on the open market, except 9that a tax credit may be transferred to an affiliate. Tax 10credits earned by a partnership, limited liability company, S 11corporation, or other "pass-through" entity may be allocated 12to the partners, members, or shareholders of that entity for 13their direct use in accordance with the provisions of any 14agreement among the partners, members, or shareholders. Any 15amount of tax credit that the taxpayer, or partner, member, or 16shareholder thereof, is prohibited from claiming in a taxable 17year may be carried forward to any of the taxpayer's 5 18subsequent taxable years.19(Source: P.A. 95-1024, eff. 12-31-08.) 20    (20 ILCS 663/20)21    Sec. 20. Annual cap on credits. The Department shall limit 22the monetary amount of qualified equity investments permitted   HB4636- 2 -LRB104 18261 HLH 31700 b1under this Act to a level necessary to limit tax credit use at 2no more than (i) $20,000,000 in tax credits for fiscal years 3beginning before July 1, 2023, and (ii) $25,000,000 in tax 4credits for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2023 and 5beginning before July 1, 2029, and (iii) $37,000,000 in tax 6credits for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2029. 7This limitation on qualified equity investments shall be based 8on the anticipated use of credits without regard to the 9potential for taxpayers to carry forward tax credits to later 10tax years.11(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23.) 12    (20 ILCS 663/25)13    Sec. 25. Certification of qualified equity investments. 14    (a) A qualified community development entity that seeks to 15have an equity investment or long-term debt security 16designated as a qualified equity investment and eligible for 17tax credits under this Section shall apply to the Department. 18The qualified community development entity must submit an 19application on a form that the Department provides that 20includes:21        (1) The name, address, tax identification number of 22    the entity, and evidence of the entity's certification as 23    a qualified community development entity.24        (2) A copy of the allocation agreement executed by the 25    entity, or its controlling entity, and the Community   HB4636- 3 -LRB104 18261 HLH 31700 b1    Development Financial Institutions Fund.2        (3) A certificate executed by an executive officer of 3    the entity attesting that the allocation agreement remains 4    in effect and has not been revoked or cancelled by the 5    Community Development Financial Institutions Fund.6        (4) A description of the proposed amount, structure, 7    and purchaser of the equity investment or long-term debt 8    security.9        (5) The name and tax identification number of any 10    taxpayer eligible to utilize tax credits earned as a 11    result of the issuance of the qualified equity investment.12        (6) Information regarding the proposed use of proceeds 13    from the issuance of the qualified equity investment.14        (7) A nonrefundable application fee of $5,000. This 15    fee shall be paid to the Department and shall be required 16    of each application submitted.17        (8) With respect to qualified equity investments made 18    on or after January 1, 2017, the amount of qualified 19    equity investment authority the applicant agrees to 20    designate as a federal qualified equity investment under 21    Section 45D of the Internal Revenue Code, including a copy 22    of the screen shot from the Community Development 23    Financial Institutions Fund's Allocation Tracking System 24    of the applicant's remaining federal qualified equity 25    investment authority. 26    (b) Within 30 days after receipt of a completed   HB4636- 4 -LRB104 18261 HLH 31700 b1application containing the information necessary for the 2Department to certify a potential qualified equity investment, 3including the payment of the application fee, the Department 4shall grant or deny the application in full or in part. If the 5Department denies any part of the application, it shall inform 6the qualified community development entity of the grounds for 7the denial. If the qualified community development entity 8provides any additional information required by the Department 9or otherwise completes its application within 15 days of the 10notice of denial, the application shall be considered 11completed as of the original date of submission. If the 12qualified community development entity fails to provide the 13information or complete its application within the 15-day 14period, the application remains denied and must be resubmitted 15in full with a new submission date.16    (c) If the application is deemed complete, the Department 17shall certify the proposed equity investment or long-term debt 18security as a qualified equity investment that is eligible for 19tax credits under this Section, subject to the limitations 20contained in Section 20. The Department shall provide written 21notice of the certification to the qualified community 22development entity. The notice shall include the names of 23those taxpayers who are eligible to utilize the credits and 24their respective credit amounts. If the names of the taxpayers 25who are eligible to utilize the credits change due to a 26transfer of a qualified equity investment or a change in an   HB4636- 5 -LRB104 18261 HLH 31700 b1allocation pursuant to Section 15, the qualified community 2development entity shall notify the Department of such change.3    (d) With respect to applications received before January 41, 2017, the Department shall certify qualified equity 5investments in the order applications are received by the 6Department. Applications received on the same day shall be 7deemed to have been received simultaneously. For applications 8received on the same day and deemed complete, the Department 9shall certify, consistent with remaining tax credit capacity, 10qualified equity investments in proportionate percentages 11based upon the ratio of the amount of qualified equity 12investment requested in an application to the total amount of 13qualified equity investments requested in all applications 14received on the same day.15    (d-5) With respect to applications received on or after 16January 1, 2017, the Department shall certify applications by 17applicants that agree to designate qualified equity 18investments as federal qualified equity investments in 19accordance with item (8) of subsection (a) of this Section in 20proportionate percentages based upon the ratio of the amount 21of qualified equity investments requested in an application to 22be designated as federal qualified equity investments to the 23total amount of qualified equity investments to be designated 24as federal qualified equity investments requested in all 25applications received on the same day. 26    (d-10) With respect to applications received on or after   HB4636- 6 -LRB104 18261 HLH 31700 b1January 1, 2017, after complying with subsection (d-5), the 2Department shall certify the qualified equity investments of 3all other applicants, including the remaining qualified equity 4investment authority requested by applicants not designated as 5federal qualified equity investments in accordance with item 6(8) of subsection (a) of this Section, in proportionate 7percentages based upon the ratio of the amount of qualified 8equity investments requested in the applications to the total 9amount of qualified equity investments requested in all 10applications received on the same day. 11    (e) Once the Department has certified qualified equity 12investments that, on a cumulative basis, are eligible for an 13amount of credits equal to the annual cap on credits set forth 14in Section 20, $20,000,000 in tax credits (for taxable years 15beginning before July 1, 2023) or $25,000,000 in tax credits 16(for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2023), the 17Department may not certify any more qualified equity 18investments. If a pending request cannot be fully certified, 19the Department shall certify the portion that may be certified 20unless the qualified community development entity elects to 21withdraw its request rather than receive partial credit.22    (f) Within 30 days after receiving notice of 23certification, the qualified community development entity 24shall (i) issue the qualified equity investment and receive 25cash in the amount of the certified amount and (ii) with 26respect to qualified equity investments made on or after   HB4636- 7 -LRB104 18261 HLH 31700 b1January 1, 2017, if applicable, designate the required amount 2of qualified equity investment authority as a federal 3qualified equity investment. The qualified community 4development entity must provide the Department with evidence 5of the receipt of the cash investment within 10 business days 6after receipt and, with respect to qualified equity 7investments made on or after January 1, 2017, if applicable, 8provide evidence that the required amount of qualified equity 9investment authority was designated as a federal qualified 10equity investment. If the qualified community development 11entity does not receive the cash investment and issue the 12qualified equity investment within 30 days following receipt 13of the certification notice, the certification shall lapse and 14the entity may not issue the qualified equity investment 15without reapplying to the Department for certification. A 16certification that lapses reverts back to the Department and 17may be reissued only in accordance with the application 18process outline in this Section 25.19    (g) Allocation rounds enabled by this Act shall be applied 20for according to the following schedule: 21        (1) on January 2, 2019, $125,000,000 of qualified 22    equity investments; 23        (2) not less than 45 days after but not more than 90 24    days after the Community Development Financial 25    Institutions Fund of the United States Department of the 26    Treasury announces allocation awards under a Notice of   HB4636- 8 -LRB104 18261 HLH 31700 b1    Funding Availability that is published in the Federal 2    Register after September 6, 2019, $125,000,000 of 3    qualified equity investments; and 4        (3) on or after January 1, 2024, but not more than 120 5    days after the Community Development Financial 6    Institutions Fund of the United States Department of the 7    Treasury announces allocation awards under a Notice of 8    Funding Availability that was published in the Federal 9    Register on November 22, 2022, $312,500,000 of qualified 10    equity investments; . 11        (4) on or after January 1, 2027, but not later than 120 12    days after the Community Development Financial 13    Institutions Fund of the United States Department of the 14    Treasury, or any successor office with primary 15    responsibility for administering Section 45D of the 16    Internal Revenue Code, announces allocation awards for the 17    most recent federal application round conducted under a 18    Notice of Funding Available published in the Federal 19    Register, $150,000,000 of qualified equity investments; 20        (5) on or after January 1, 2029, but not later than 120 21    days after the Community Development Financial 22    Institutions Fund of the United States Department of the 23    Treasury, or any successor office with primary 24    responsibility for administering Section 45D of the 25    Internal Revenue Code, announces allocation awards for the 26    most recent federal application round conducted under a   HB4636- 9 -LRB104 18261 HLH 31700 b1    Notice of Funding Available published in the Federal 2    Register, $150,000,000 of qualified equity investments; 3    and 4        (6) on or after January 1, 2031, but not later than 120 5    days after the Community Development Financial 6    Institutions Fund of the United States Department of the 7    Treasury, or any successor office with primary 8    responsibility for administering Section 45D of the 9    Internal Revenue Code, announces allocation awards for the 10    most recent federal application round conducted under a 11    Notice of Funding Available published in the Federal 12    Register, $150,000,000 of qualified equity investments. 13    Certifications shall be subject to the annual limitations 14on tax credits set forth in Section 20. 15(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23.) 16    (20 ILCS 663/50)17    Sec. 50. Sunset. For fiscal years following fiscal year 182037 2031, qualified equity investments shall not be made 19under this Act unless reauthorization is made pursuant to this 20Section. For all fiscal years following fiscal year 2031, 21unless the General Assembly adopts a joint resolution granting 22authority to the Department to approve qualified equity 23investments for the Illinois new markets development program 24and clearly describing the amount of tax credits available for 25the next fiscal year, or otherwise complies with the   HB4636- 10 -LRB104 18261 HLH 31700 b1provisions of this Section, no qualified equity investments 2may be permitted to be made under this Act. The amount of 3available tax credits contained in such a resolution shall not 4exceed the limitation provided under Section 20. Nothing in 5this Section precludes a taxpayer who makes a qualified equity 6investment prior to the expiration of authority to make 7qualified equity investments from claiming tax credits 8relating to that qualified equity investment for each 9applicable credit allowance date.10(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-9, eff. 6-7-23.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.